District of Columbia statutes.
6-701.06

Obstruction of halls and stairways.

It shall be unlawful to obstruct any hall, passageway, corridor, or stairway in any building enumerated in this part with baggage, trunks, furniture, cans, or with any other thing whatsoever.

Mar. 19, 1906, 34 Stat. 71, ch. 957, § 6
June 4, 1934, 48 Stat. 844, ch. 388
1981 Ed., § 5-506.
1973 Ed., § 5-306.